Illinois, session 104th, HB4595.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Sections 8-206.5 and by adding Sections 4-616, 8-205.5, and 616-107.10 as follows: 7    (220 ILCS 5/4-616 new)8    Sec. 4-616. Commission reporting.9    (a) The Commission shall monitor the impact of each public 10utility in this State on overall consumer savings and on the 11electrical grid of this State.12    (b) The Commission shall submit an annual report to the 13Governor, the Attorney General, and the General Assembly that 14summarizes the results of the Commission's efforts under 15subsection (a) no later than one year after the effective date 16of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and 17annually thereafter. 18    (220 ILCS 5/8-205.5 new)19    Sec. 8-205.5. Bill cap for extreme weather conditions. 20    (a) A utility shall cap residential rates for qualifying 21households at a set monthly maximum during a city, county, or 22State declaration of a winter weather emergency or an extreme   HB4595- 2 -LRB104 16771 AAS 30180 b1heat warning that covers the area of the utility in which the 2qualifying household is located.3    For the purpose of this subsection (a), "qualifying 4household" means a household where:5        (i) a person using the household as that person's 6    principal place of residence is 65 years of age or older;7        (ii) a person using the household as that person's 8    principal place of residence qualifies as a person with a 9    disability, as defined under the federal Supplemental 10    Security Income program, and is medically fragile and 11    technology dependent; or12        (iii) the household meets the definition of 13    "low-income household" under the Illinois Affordable 14    Housing Act.15    (b) Each utility in this State shall file with the 16Commission prior to December 1 of each year a plan detailing 17the implementation of this Section. All plans are subject to 18review and approval by the Commission. The Commission may 19direct a utility to modify its plan to comply with the 20requirements of this Section.21    (c) A utility that has a plan on file with the Commission 22shall not be required to resubmit a new plan each year. 23However, any alteration of the plan on file must be submitted 24to and approved by the Commission prior to December 1 of that 25year.   HB4595- 3 -LRB104 16771 AAS 30180 b1    (220 ILCS 5/8-206.5)2    Sec. 8-206.5. Disconnection Protection Program.3    (a) No later than June 1, 2025, each electric and gas 4utility serving more than 500,000 customers in this State 5shall implement a Disconnection Protection Program, whereby 6customers who have applied for assistance through the Low 7Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) or Percentage 8of Income Payment Plan (PIPP) shall be temporarily protected 9from disconnection for 30 days after the utility receives 10notice from a local administrative agency that the customer 11has submitted an application to LIHEAP or PIPP and, in cases 12where LIHEAP or PIPP assistance is received, for another 45 13days after receiving the notice. Any customer who applies for, 14but does not receive, LIHEAP or PIPP assistance shall, by 15operation of this Section, only be temporarily protected from 16disconnection once in any program year.17    (b) Each electric and gas utility may recover costs for 18implementation, administration, and ongoing operation of its 19Disconnection Protection Program through the utility's revenue 20requirement, subject to a review for prudence and 21reasonableness by the Commission.22    (c) A customer who submits to an electric or gas utility 23documentation that shows that the customer is enrolled in the 24Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), the 25Percentage of Income Payment Plan (PIPP), or a medical 26assistance program established under Article V of the Illinois   HB4595- 4 -LRB104 16771 AAS 30180 b1Public Aid Code shall be granted protection under the 2utility's Disconnection Protection Program upon the receipt of 3the customer's documentation by the utility. If the utility, 4upon reviewing the customer's documentation, determines that 5the documentation does not provide sufficient proof that the 6customer is enrolled in LIHEAP, PIPP, or a medical assistance 7program established under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid 8Code, the utility may remove the customer from the utility's 9Disconnection Protection Program. A utility shall provide 10notice to a customer when the customer is granted protection 11under a Disconnection Protection Program pursuant to this 12subsection (c) and when the customer has been removed from the 13utility's Disconnection Protection Program. 14(Source: P.A. 103-661, eff. 1-1-25.) 15    (220 ILCS 5/16-107.10 new)16    Sec. 16-107.10. Market-based rate option cap. An electric 17utility that offers at least one market-based rate option, 18including, but not limited to, net electricity metering under 19the terms of Section 16-107.5, for retail customers who choose 20to take power and energy supply service from the utility shall 21limit peak hour rates under the market-based rate option to no 22more than 150% of the rate that the customer would otherwise 23pay if the customer was not using the market-based rate 24option.  HB4595- 5 -LRB104 16771 AAS 30180 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    220 ILCS 5/4-616 new4    220 ILCS 5/8-205.5 new5    220 ILCS 5/8-206.56    220 ILCS 5/16-107.10 new